Arkansas, session 2025, SB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-903, concerning report cards provided
by each public school district to each student, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) A student's report card provided under this section shall include
a statement regarding the student's current reading grade level.

/s/J. Scott









*TNL217*
02-19-2025 11:52:06 TNL217